Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 76.
THE CONGRESSIONAL TERM LIMITS AMENDMENT OF 1996 (CONST. AMEND. 73, § 3, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment has been declared unconstitutional by the Arkansas Supreme Court.

Amendment 76 was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the general election on November 5, 1996, by a vote of 448,938 for and 284,499 against.

Preambles.

This amendment contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas career politicians dominating Congress have a conflict of interest that prevents them from enacting meaningful term limits and making Congress what the founders intended, the branch of government most responsive to the electorate; and

“Whereas career politicians, while refusing to heed the desire of the people for meaningful term limits, amassed a nearly five trillion dollar national debt by not only voting year after year to spend far more than they have taken in, but also by voting to increase dramatically their own pay, and also providing lavish pensions from themselves and granting themselves numerous other privileges at the expense of the people; and

“Whereas such irresponsible actions on the part of career politicians have mortgaged the future of not only every American citizen, but also their children and grandchildren; and

“Whereas the abuse of power, the corruption, and the appearance of corruption brought about by political careerism is ultimately destructive to representative government by making Congress increasingly distant from the people; and

“Whereas the President of the United States is limited to two terms in office by the 22nd Amendment to the United States Constitution, and governors in forty (40) states are limited by those states' laws to two terms or less; and

“Whereas voters have established term limits for more than 2,000 state legislators, as well as more than 17,000 local officials across the nation, including state legislators and statewide elective officeholders in Arkansas; and

“Whereas in 1992, the people of the State of Arkansas enacted, by an overwhelming majority, an amendment to the State Constitution limiting service in the United States House of Representatives to three terms and in the United States Senate to two terms, and which state-imposed Congressional Term Limits were ruled unconstitutional by the United States Supreme Court; and

“Whereas the United States Congress has ignored the desire of the people for meaningful term limits by refusing to submit to the states for ratification and amendment instituting Congressional Term Limits, and by proposing exceedingly long limits for its own members; and

“Whereas it is the people themselves, not the United States Congress, who have in the past by majority vote, and should in the future set limits for the terms of Congressional offices; and

“Whereas the people have a sovereign right and a compelling interest in the creation and preservation of a citizen Congress that will more effectively protect the freedom and prosperity of the people, which interest and right may not be as effectively served in any way other than that proposed by this amendment to the Arkansas State Constitution; and

“Whereas with foresight and wisdom our founders, under Article V of the United States Constitution, did provide the people with a procedure by which to overcome Congressional self-interest, by which procedure the people of the several states may call a convention to propose amendments to the United States Constitution when two-thirds or thirty-four (34) states expressly call for a convention; and

“Whereas amendments proposed by such a convention would become a part of the United States Constitution upon the ratification of three-fourths of the states (38); and

“Whereas the people of the State of Arkansas desire to amend the United States Constitution to establish term limits on Congress to ensure representation in Congress by true citizen lawmakers;

“THEREFORE, BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:”

§ 1. Congressional Delegation (Const. Amend. 73, § 3 amended).

Section 3 of Amendment 73 to the Arkansas Constitution is hereby amended to add to the current language the following subsections:

(c)

The foregoing provisions in sections (a) and (b) shall be revived upon passage of appropriate federal laws.

(d)

It is the official position of the people of the State of Arkansas that all of our elected officials should vote to enact, by amendment to the United States Constitution, term limits for members of the United States Congress that are not longer than: three (3) two-year terms in the United States House of Representatives, nor two (2) six-year terms in the United States Senate, respectively.

(e)

It is the will of the people of the State of Arkansas that the following amendment be added to the United States Constitution:

“Congressional Term Limits Amendment

“Section A. No person shall serve in the office of United States Representative for more than three terms, but upon ratification of the Congressional Term Limits Amendment no person who has held the office of United States Representative or who then holds the office shall serve for more than two additional terms.

“Section B. No person shall serve in the office of United States Senator for more than two terms, but upon ratification of the Congressional Term Limits Amendment no person who has held the office of United States Senator or who then holds the office shall serve more than one additional term.

“Section C. This article shall have no time limit within which it must be ratified by the legislatures of three-fourths of the several states.[”]

(f)
(1)

As provided in this subsection, and in subsections (h) and (j) of this section, at each primary, special, and general election for the office of United States Representative, United States Senator, or any state legislator, the ballot shall inform voters regarding any incumbent and non-incumbent candidate's failure to support “The Congressional Term Limits Amendment” proposed above.

(g)

Each member of the Arkansas Delegation to the United States Congress is hereby instructed to use all of the powers of the Congressional office to pass the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in subsection (e) above.

(h)

All primary, general, and special election ballots shall have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” printed adjacent to the name of any United States Representative or United States Senator who:

Failed to vote in favor of the Congressional Term Limits Amendment proposed in subsection (e) when brought to any vote;

Failed to second the Congressional Term Limits Amendment proposed in subsection (e) if it lacked for a second before any proceeding of the legislative body;

Failed to propose or otherwise bring to a vote of the full legislative body the Congressional Term Limits Amendment proposed in subsection (e) above if it otherwise lacked a legislator who so proposed or brought to a vote of the full legislative body the Congressional Term Limits Amendment proposed in subsection (e) above; or

Failed to vote in favor of discharging the Congressional Term Limits Amendment proposed in subsection (e) before any committee or subcommittee upon which the Legislator served in the respective legislative body; or

Failed to vote against or reject any attempt to delay, table, or otherwise prevent a vote by the full legislative body on the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in subsection (e); or

Failed to vote against any term limits proposal with terms longer than those set forth in the Congressional Term Limits Amendment proposed in subsection (e); or

Sponsored or co-sponsored any proposed constitutional amendment or law that proposes term limits longer than those in the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in subsection (e); or

Failed to ensure that all legislative votes on Congressional Term Limits were recorded and made available to the public.

(j)

Notwithstanding any other provision of Arkansas law:

“I support Congressional Term Limits and pledge to use all of my legislative powers to enact the proposed Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in the United States Congressional Term Limits Amendment of 1996. If elected, I pledge to act and to vote in such a way that the information ‘DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS’ will not appear next to my name.”

The pledge form will provide a space for the signature of the candidate and the date of the signature.

(k)

The House of Representatives of the State of Arkansas, and the Arkansas Senate, due to the desire of the people of the State of Arkansas to establish term limits for the Congress of the United States, are hereby instructed to make the following application to the United States Congress, pursuant to their powers under Article V of the United States Constitution, to wit:

“We, the people and the legislature of the State of Arkansas, due to our desire to establish term limits on the members of the Congress of the United States, hereby make application to the United States Congress, pursuant to our power under Article V of the United States Constitution, to call a convention for proposing amendments to the Constitution.”

(l)

Each state legislator is hereby instructed to use all powers delegated to each legislator to pass the Article V application to the United States Congress set forth in subsection (k) above, and to ratify, if proposed, the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth above.

(m)

Not withstanding any other provision of Arkansas Law:

(1)

All primary, general, and special election ballots shall have the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” printed adjacent to the name of any State Senator or State Representative who:

(2)

The information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” as required by any of subsection (1)(A) through (1)(J) shall not appear adjacent to the names of the candidates for the state legislature if the State of Arkansas has made application to Congress for a convention for proposing amendments to the United States Constitution pursuant to this amendment and such application is currently effective, has not been withdrawn, and has not expired.

(3)

The information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” as required by either of subsections (1)(K) or (1)(L) shall not appear adjacent to the names of the candidates for the state legislature if: The Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth above has been submitted to the states for ratification and ratified by the Arkansas Legislature; or the Congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth and proposed in subsection (e) has become a part of the United States Constitution.

(n)
(1)

The Secretary of State of the State of Arkansas shall be responsible for making an accurate determination as to whether a candidate for state or federal legislative office shall have placed next to the candidate's name on the election ballot the information “DISREGARDED VOTERS' INSTRUCTION ON TERM LIMITS” or the information “DECLINED TO PLEDGE TO SUPPORT TERM LIMITS” and for certifying the appropriate indication to the appropriate county clerks and other appropriate voting officials.

(2)

The Secretary of State, in accordance with subsection (1) of this subsection, shall be responsible for making an accurate determination from any reliable source.

(3)

The Secretary of State shall consider timely submitted public comments prior to making the determination required in subsection (1) of this section.

In the case of United States Representatives and United States Senators, this determination, declaration, and certification shall be made in a fashion necessary to ensure orderly printing of primary and general election ballots with allowance made for all legal action provided in subsections (5), (6) and (7), below, and shall be based upon each Congressional member's actions during their current term of office and any actions taken in any concluded term, if such action was taken after the determination and declaration was made by the Secretary of State previously.

In the case of incumbent state legislators, this determination and declaration shall be made not later than thirty (30) days after the end of the regular session following each general election, and shall be based upon legislative action in the previous regular session or any action taken in any special session in the previous four (4) years, but in no event upon any actions taken before the adoption of this amendment.

The Secretary of State shall provide official notification to the incumbents by certified mail and to the public by official media statement and legal publication in a newspaper of statewide circulation at least two separate times prior to the election, in accordance with the time frames set forth herein.

(o)

The Arkansas Supreme Court shall hear the appeal provided for in subsections (n)(6) and (n)(7) of this section, on an expedited basis as the first priority among any Supreme Court case, and shall issue its decision on an expedited basis before any other civil appeals are resolved after submission of the matter to the Arkansas Supreme Court. Failure of the Arkansas Supreme Court to render a timely decision will require the Secretary of State to certify the challenged language for placement on the ballot next to the candidate's name.

(p)

At such time as the congressional Term Limits Amendment set forth in subsection (e) has become a part of the United States Constitution, subsections (e) through (o) of this amendment automatically shall be repealed.

(q)

Repealer. All laws in conflict with the foregoing are hereby repealed.

(r)

Severability. If any portion, clause, or phrase of this Amendment is for any reason held to be invalid or unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining portions, clauses, and phrases shall not be affected, but shall remain in full force and effect.

Publisher's Notes.

This Amendment has been declared unconstitutional by the Arkansas Supreme Court.

The bracketed closing quotation marks at the end of subsection (e) were added by the Publisher.